West Virginia, session 2026, HB4204.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. Authorization for Department of administration to promulgate legislative rules. §64-2-1. Board of Risk and Insurance Management. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 21, 2025, authorized under the authority of §29-12-5 of this code, relating to the Board of Risk and Insurance Management (Preferred Medical Liability and High Risk Medical Liability Program, 115 CSR 06), is authorized.